Arkansas, session 2025, SB404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 28-40-111(a)(4), concerning notice of the
probate of an estate to creditors, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A) Within one (1) month after the first publication of the
notice, a copy of the notice shall also be served in accordance with § 28-1-
112(b)(1), § 28-1-112(b)(2), or § 28-1-112(b)(3) upon each heir and devisee
whose name and address are known and upon all unpaid creditors whose names,
status as creditors, and addresses are known to or reasonably ascertainable
by the personal representative, including the:
(i) The Department of Human Services if it is known
or could reasonably be ascertained that the department Department of Human
*LJH032*
03/06/2025 3:43:10 PM LJH032

SB404
Services has rendered services to the decedent, in accordance with § 28-1-
112(b)(1), § 28-1-112(b)(2), or § 28-1-112(b)(3); and
(ii) The Department of Finance and Administration if
the Department of Finance and Administration has filed a certificate of
indebtedness against the decedent under § 26-18-701 in the county in which
the probate action was filed or as otherwise provided in § 26-18-701.
(B)(i) Notice to the department The notice required under
subdivision (a)(4)(A)(i) of this section shall be served upon the Office of
Chief Counsel, Decedent's Estates, P.O. Box 1437, Little Rock, AR 72203.
(ii) A copy of the petition for probate of a will or
administration of an estate and the decedent's social security number shall
be attached to the notice served upon the department The notice required
under subdivision (a)(4)(A)(ii) of this section shall be served upon the
Garnishment Section, Probate Division, P.O. Box 1369, Suite 1450, Little
Rock, AR 72203.
(iii) Notice served under subdivision (a)(4)(B) of
this section shall include a copy of the petition for probate of a will or
administration of an estate and the decedent’s Social Security number.
(C)(i) If, thereafter, the names and addresses of any such
creditors are ascertained, a copy of the notice shall be promptly served upon
them.
(ii) The burden of proof on any issue as to whether
a creditor was known to or reasonably ascertainable by the personal
representative shall be upon the creditor claiming entitlement to such actual
notice.











03/06/2025 3:43:10 PM LJH032